Tennessee, session 114, SB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2026, the department of health shall submit a
report that lists each drug that is psychotropic medication as defined in § 49-2-124 and the side
effects of each drug listed to the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate and the
chair of the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over health-related
matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1064
003271
- 1 -